th: พื้นที่ครอบคลุมดาวเทียม: แอฟริกา; เอเชีย; ออสเตรเลีย; ยุโรปกลาง; แอฟริกาตะวันออก; ยุโรปตะวันออก; ยุโรป; แอฟริกากลาง; แอฟริกาเหนือ; อเมริกาเหนือ; อเมริกาใต้; เอเชียตะวันออกเฉียงใต้; แอฟริกาใต้; แอฟริกาตะวันตก; ยุโรปตะวันตก; อื่นๆ
it: Area di copertura satellitare: Africa; Asia; Australia; Europa centrale; Africa orientale; Europa orientale; Europa; Africa centrale; Nord Africa; Nord America; Sud America; Sud-est asiatico; Africa meridionale; Africa occidentale; Europa occidentale; Altro
ru: Зона покрытия спутника: Африка; Азия; Австралия; Центральная Европа; Восточная Африка; Восточная Европа; Европа; Центральная Африка; Северная Африка; Северная Америка; Южная Америка; Юго-Восточная Азия; Южная Африка; Западная Африка; Западная Европа; Другой
pt-PT: Área de cobertura por satélite: África; Ásia; Austrália; Europa Central; África Oriental; Leste Europeu; Europa; África Central; Norte de África; América do Norte; América do Sul; Sudeste Asiático; África do Sul; África Ocidental; Europa Ocidental; Outro
da: Satellitdækningsområde: Afrika; Asien; Australien; Centraleuropa; Østafrika; Østeuropa; Europa; Mellemafrika; Nordafrika; Nordamerika; Sydamerika; Sydøstasien; Sydafrika; Vestafrika; Vesteuropa; Andet
sl-SI: Območje pokritosti satelita: Afrika; Azija; Avstralija; Srednja Evropa; Vzhodna Afrika; Vzhodna Evropa; Evropa; Srednja Afrika; Severna Afrika; Severna Amerika; Južna Amerika; Jugovzhodna Azija; Južna Afrika; Zahodna Afrika; Zahodna Evropa; Drugo
fr: Zone de couverture satellite: Afrique; Asie; Australie; Europe centrale; Afrique de l'Est; Europe de l’Est; Europe; Afrique centrale; Afrique du Nord; Amérique du Nord; Amérique du Sud; Asie du Sud Est; Sud de l’Afrique; Afrique de l'Ouest; Europe de l'Ouest; Autre
ja: 衛星カバーエリア: アフリカ; アジア; オーストラリア; 中央ヨーロッパ; 東アフリカ; 東ヨーロッパ; ヨーロッパ; 中部アフリカ; 北アフリカ; 北米; 南米; 東南アジア; 南アフリカ; 西アフリカ; 西ヨーロッパ; その他
fi: Satelliitin peittoalue: Afrikka; Aasia; Australia; Keski-Eurooppa; Itä-Afrikka; Itä-Eurooppa; Eurooppa; Keski-Afrikka; Pohjois-Afrikka; Pohjois-Amerikka; Etelä-Amerikka; Kaakkois-Aasia; Etelä-Afrikka; Länsi-Afrikka; Länsi-Eurooppa; Muu
ko: 위성 서비스 지역: 아프리카; 아시아; 호주; 중부 유럽; 동아프리카; 동유럽; 유럽; 중앙 아프리카; 북아프리카; 북아메리카; 남아메리카; 동남아시아; 남아프리카; 서아프리카; 서유럽; 기타
zh-CN: 卫星覆盖范围: 非洲; 亚洲; 澳洲; 欧洲中部; 东非; 东欧; 欧洲; 中非; 北非; 北美; 南美; 东南亚; 南非; 西非; 西欧; 其他
en: Satellite coverage area: Africa; Asia; Australia; Central Europe; East Africa; Eastern Europe; Europe; Middle Africa; North Africa; North America; South America; South East Asia; Southern Africa; Western Africa; Western Europe; Other
cs: Oblast satelitního pokrytí: Afrika; Asie; Austrálie; Střední Evropa; Východní Afrika; Východní Evropa; Evropa; Střední Afrika; Severní Afrika; Severní Amerika; Jižní Amerika; Jihovýchodní Asie; Jižní Afrika; Západní Afrika; Západní Evropa; Jiné
sk-SK: Oblasť pokrytia satelitom: Afrika; Ázia; Austrália; Stredná Európa; Východná Afrika; Východná Európa; Európa; Stredná Afrika; Severná Afrika; Severná Amerika; Južná Amerika; Juhovýchodná Ázia; Južná Afrika; Západná Afrika; Západná Európa; Iné
lt-LT: Palydovinio telefono aprėpties zona: Afrika; Azija; Australija; Vidurio Europa; Rytų Afrika; Rytų Europa; Europa; Vidurio Afrika; Šiaurės Afrika; Šiaurės Amerika; Pietų Amerika; Pietryčių Azija; Pietų Afrika; Vakarų Afrika; Vakarų Europa; Kita
ro-RO: Zona de acoperire prin satelit: Africa; Asia; Australia; Europa Centrală; Africa de Est; Europa de Est; Europa; Africa Centrală; Africa de Nord; America de Nord; America de Sud; Asia de Sud-Est; Africa de Sud; Africa de Vest; Europa de Vest; Altele
sv: Satellittäckningsområde: Afrika; Asien; Australien; Centraleuropa; Östafrika; Östeuropa; Europa; Mellersta Afrika; Nordafrika; Nordamerika; Sydamerika; Sydöstasien; Södra Afrika; Västafrika; Västeuropa; Övrigt
el: Περιοχή δορυφορικής κάλυψης: Αφρική; Ασία; Αυστραλία; Κεντρική Ευρώπη; Ανατολική Αφρική; Ανατολική Ευρώπη; Ευρώπη; Κεντρική Αφρική; Βόρεια Αφρική; Βόρεια Αμερική; Νότια Αμερική; Νοτιοανατολική Ασία; Νότιος Αφρική; Δυτική Αφρική; Ανατολική Ευρώπη; Άλλο
bg-BG: Зона на сателитно покритие: Африка; Азия; Австралия; Централна Европа; Източна Африка; Източна Европа; Европа; Средна Африка; Северна Африка; Северна Америка; Южна Америка; Югоизточна Азия; Южна Африка; Западна Африка; Западна Европа; Други
hr-HR: Područje satelitske pokrivenosti: Afrika; Azija; Australija; Srednja Europa; Istočna Afrika; Istočna Europa; Europa; Srednja Afrika; Sjeverna Afrika; Sjeverna Amerika; Južna Amerika; Jugoistočna Azija; Južna Afrika; Zapadna Afrika; Zapadna Europa; Ostalo
tr: Uydu Kapsama Alanı: Afrika; Asya; Avustralya; Orta Avrupa; Doğu Afrika; Doğu Avrupa; Avrupa; Orta Afrika; Kuzey Afrika; Kuzey Amerika; Güney Amerika; Güneydoğu Asya; Güney Afrika; Batı Afrika; Batı Avrupa; Diğer
zh-TW: 衛星覆蓋區域: 非洲; 亞洲; 澳洲; 中歐; 東非; 東歐; 歐洲; 中非; 北非; 北美洲; 南美洲; 東南亞; 南非; 西非; 西歐; 其他
nb: Satellittdekningsområde: Afrika; Asia; Australia; Sentraleuropa; Øst-Afrika; Øst-Europa; Europa; Midt-Afrika; Nord-Afrika; Nord-Amerika; Sør-Amerika; Sørøst-Asia; Sør-Afrika; Vest-Afrika; Vest-Europa; Annet
vi: Vùng phủ sóng vệ tinh: Châu Phi; Châu Á; Châu Úc; Trung Âu; Đông Phi; Đông Âu; Châu Âu; Trung Phi; Bắc Phi; Bắc Mỹ; Nam Mỹ; Đông Nam Á; Nam Phi; Tây Phi; Tây Âu; Khác
pl: Obszar pokrycia satelitarnego: Afryka; Azja; Australia; Europa Środkowa; Afryka Wschodnia; Eastern Europe; Europa; Bliski Wschód; Afryka Północna; Ameryka Północna; Ameryka Południowa; Azja Południowo-wschodnia; Afryka Południowa; Afryka Zachodnia; Wielka Brytania; Inne
nl: Satellietdekkingsgebied: Afrika; Azië; Australië; Centraal Europa; Oost-Afrika; Oost-Europa; Europa; Midden-Afrika; Noord-Afrika; Noord-Amerika; South America; Zuid-Oost Azië; Zuidelijk Afrika; West-Afrika; West-Europa; Andere
pt-BR: Área de cobertura de satélite: África; Ásia; Austrália; Europa Central; Africano oriental; Europa oriental; Europa; África Central; Norte da África; América do Norte; América do Sul; Sudeste da Ásia; Sul da África; África Oriental; Europa Ocidental; Outro
de: Satellitenabdeckungsbereich: Afrika; Asien; Australien; Zentraleuropa; Ostafrika; Osteuropa; Europa; Mittelafrika; Nordafrika; Nordamerika; Südamerika; Südostasien; Südafrika; Westafrika; Westeuropa; Sonstiges
hu: Műholdas lefedettségi terület: Afrika; Ázsia; Ausztrália; Közép-Európa; Kelet-Afrika; Kelet-Európa; Európa; Közép-Afrika; Észak-Afrika; Észak-Amerika; Dél-Amerika; Délkelet-Ázsia; Dél-Afrika; Nyugat-Afrika; Nyugat-Európa; Egyéb
es: Área de cobertura satelital: África; Asia; Australia; Europa Central; África oriental; Europa del este; Europa; África Central; Norte de África; América del norte; América del sur; Sudeste de Asia; África del Sur; África Occidental; Europa occidental; Otros